Georgia statutes. 
(D) Forty percent of the property taxes shall be exempt for the next year; and

(E) Twenty percent of the property taxes shall be exempt for the tenth year.

(2) For any qualifying business or service enterprise, the schedule provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection may begin in any year during which an area has an enterprise zone designation. Such tax exemption may continue even if the area's enterprise zone designation has terminated. A minimum of five new jobs must be maintained for a qualifying business or service enterprise to maintain eligibility for the tax exemption provided pursuant to this Code section.

(b) If the project consists of new residential construction, residential rehabilitation, or other rehabilitation of an existing structure and the value of the improvement exceeds the value of the land by a ratio of five to one, then the exemption schedule in subsection (a) of this Code section shall also apply whether or not the project is carried out by a qualifying business or service enterprise.

(c) In no event shall the value of the property tax exemptions granted to qualifying business and service enterprises within an enterprise zone created by a city, a county, or both, exceed 10 percent of the value of the property tax digest of the creating jurisdiction or jurisdictions.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-88-8, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1481, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 333, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 939, § 5; Ga. L. 2017, p. 52, § 4/HB 342.)

Annotations

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, inserted "other than an enterprise zone under subsection (g) of Code Section 36-88-6," near the middle of paragraph (a)(1); and substituted "tenth year" for "last year" near the end of subparagraph (a)(1)(E).

Cross references. - Tax credits for business enterprises in less developed areas, § 48-7-40.1.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2004, p. 939, § 6, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment by that Act shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2004.

36-88-9. Other tax incentives; reporting.

Statute text

(a) In addition to other incentives, the local governing body or bodies creating an enterprise zone may include in the creating ordinance an exemption or abatement from occupation taxes, regulatory fees, building inspection fees, and other fees that would otherwise have been imposed on a qualifying business. Such governing bodies may grant any of these incentives either when the enterprise is initially created or by subsequent resolution making such incentives applicable to an existing enterprise zone.

(b) Local governments shall report designations of enterprise zones to the department, providing sufficient information to identify at a minimum the geographic boundaries of the zones, the specific fees and taxes to be exempted or abated, and the beginning and end dates of the designation period. The time and manner of reporting shall be determined by the department.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-88-9, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1481, § 1.)

36-88-10. Time limitations.

Statute text

An area designated as an enterprise zone shall remain in existence for ten years from the first day of the calendar year immediately following its designation as an enterprise zone; provided, however, that an area designated as an enterprise zone under subsection (g) of Code Section 36-88-6 shall remain in existence for 30 years from such day or until the redevelopment project required in subparagraph (g)(1)(B) of Code Section 36-88-6 is complete and any revenue bonds issued under paragraph (4) of subsection (g) of Code Section 36-88-6 are retired, whichever first occurs. Municipal and county governments may enter into agreements with qualifying business or service enterprises in designated enterprise zones to provide for modification or termination of the tax and fee exemptions and abatements. Property tax incentives available to a qualified business or service enterprise in an enterprise zone shall remain in effect for the full ten-year period established by Code Section 36-88-8, regardless of the termination of the designation of the enterprise zone.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-88-10, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1481, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 52, § 5/HB 342.)

Annotations

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, added the proviso at the end of the first sentence.

——————————

CHAPTER 89

HOMEOWNER TAX RELIEF GRANTS

Sec.

36-89-1. Definitions.

36-89-2. Appropriation; purpose.

36-89-3. Appropriation to specify amount and eligible assessed value; procedures.

36-89-4. Procedure for allotment; conditions of grant; taxpayer notice.

36-89-5. Administration; rules and regulations; excess funds.

36-89-6. Recovery of erroneous or illegal credit.

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Ga. L. 2000, p. 486, § 1 enacted a Chapter 89 of Title 36, consisting of Code Section 36-89-1. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, that Code section was redesignated as Code Section 36-80-20.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1999, p. 273, § 1 enacted this chapter; however, Ga. L. 1999, p. 1267, § 1 also enacted a chapter originally designated as this chapter which was redesignated as Chapter 90 of Title 36.

Law reviews. - For note on 1999 enactment of this chapter, see 16 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 177 (1999).

36-89-1. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Applicable rollback" means a:

(A) Rollback of an ad valorem tax millage rate pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 48-8-91 in a county or municipality that levies a local option sales tax;

(B) Rollback of an ad valorem tax millage rate pursuant to subparagraph (c)(2)(C) of Code Section 48-8-104 in a county or municipality that levies a homestead option sales tax;

(C) Subtraction from an ad valorem millage rate pursuant to Code Section 20-2-334 in a local school system that receives a state school tax credit;

(D) Reduction of an ad valorem tax millage rate pursuant to the development of a service delivery strategy under Code Section 36-70-24; and

(E) Reduction of an ad valorem tax millage rate pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 33-8-8.3 in a county that collects insurance premium tax.

(2) "County millage rate" means the net ad valorem tax millage rate, after deducting applicable rollbacks, levied by a county for county purposes and applying to qualified homesteads in the county, including any millage levied for those special districts reported on the 2004 ad valorem tax digest certified to and received by the state revenue commissioner on or before December 31, 2004, but not including any millage levied for purposes of bonded indebtedness and not including any millage levied on behalf of a county school district for educational purposes.

(3) "Eligible assessed value" means a certain stated amount of the assessed value of each qualified homestead in the state. The amount of the eligible assessed value for any given year shall be fixed in that year's General Appropriations Act.

(4) "Fiscal authority" means the individual authorized to collect ad valorem taxes for a county or municipality which levies ad valorem taxes.

(5) "Municipal millage rate" means the net ad valorem tax millage rate, after deducting applicable rollbacks, levied by a municipality for municipal purposes and applying to qualified homesteads in the municipality, including any millage levied for those special tax districts reported on the 2004 City and Independent School Millage Rate Certification certified to and received by the state revenue commissioner on or before December 31, 2004, but not including any millage levied for purposes of bonded indebtedness and not including any millage levied on behalf of an independent school district for educational purposes.

(6) "Qualified homestead" means a homestead qualified for any exemption, state, county, or school, authorized under Code Section 48-5-44.

(7) "School millage rate" means the net ad valorem tax millage rate, after deducting applicable rollbacks, levied on behalf of a county or independent school district for educational purposes and applying to qualified homesteads in the county or independent school district, not including any millage levied for purposes of bonded indebtedness and not including any millage levied for county or municipal purposes.

(8) "State millage rate" means the state millage levy.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-89-1, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 273, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1031, § 4; Ga. L. 2005, p. 138, § 1/HB 116; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 36/SB 465.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2002, p. 1031, § 9, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the Act shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 138, § 3/HB 116, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the 2005 amendment applies to all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2005.

36-89-2. Appropriation; purpose.

Statute text

In each year, the General Assembly shall appropriate funds for homeowner tax relief grants to counties, municipalities, and county or independent school districts in order to provide for more effective regulation and management of the finance and fiscal administration of the state and pursuant to and in furtherance of the provisions of Article III, Section IX, Paragraph II(c) of the Constitution; Article VII, Section III, Paragraph III of the Constitution; Article VIII, Section I, Paragraph I of the Constitution; and other provisions of the Constitution.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-89-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 273, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1031, § 5; Ga. L. 2003, p. 665, § 45; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 36/HB 942.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2002, p. 1031, § 9, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the Act shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002.

Ga. L. 2003, p. 665, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'State and Local Tax Revision Act of 2003.'"

Law reviews. - For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 233 (2003).

36-89-3. Appropriation to specify amount and eligible assessed value; procedures.

Statute text

(a) In the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2009, the General Assembly shall appropriate to the Department of Revenue funds to provide homeowner tax relief grants to counties, municipalities, and county or independent school districts. When funds are so appropriated, the General Appropriations Act shall specify the amount appropriated and the eligible assessed value of each qualified homestead in the state for the specified tax year, which eligible assessed value shall, subject to annual appropriation by the General Assembly, be not less than that specified in the Fiscal Year 2004 General Appropriations Act. If for any reason the amount appropriated in the General Appropriations Act is insufficient to fund the eligible assessed value stated in the General Appropriations Act, the amount appropriated may be adjusted in amendments to the General Appropriations Act. If the amount appropriated in the General Appropriations Act is sufficient to fund the eligible assessed value stated in the General Appropriations Act, that amount shall not be reduced or withdrawn for any reason.

(b) In the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2009, the General Assembly shall appropriate to the Department of Revenue funds to provide homeowner tax relief grants to counties, municipalities, and county or independent school districts. When funds are so appropriated, the supplemental appropriation bill shall specify the amount appropriated and the eligible assessed value of each qualified homestead in the state for the specified tax year. If for any reason the amount appropriated in the supplemental appropriation bill is insufficient to fund the eligible assessed value stated in the supplemental appropriation bill, the amount appropriated is authorized to be, but is not required to be, adjusted in the General Appropriations Act for the next succeeding fiscal year. If the amount appropriated in the General Appropriations Act is sufficient to fund the eligible assessed value stated in the General Appropriations Act, that amount shall not be reduced or withdrawn for any reason.

(c) Subject to the limitations of subsection (d) of this Code section, in each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2009, the General Assembly shall appropriate to the Department of Revenue funds to provide homeowner tax relief grants to counties, municipalities, and county or independent school districts. When funds are so appropriated, the supplemental appropriation bill shall specify the amount appropriated and the eligible assessed value of each qualified homestead in the state for the specified tax year. If for any reason the amount appropriated in the supplemental appropriation bill is insufficient to fund the eligible assessed value stated in the supplemental appropriation bill, the amount appropriated is authorized to be, but is not required to be, adjusted in the General Appropriations Act for the next succeeding fiscal year. If the amount appropriated in the General Appropriations Act is sufficient to fund the eligible assessed value stated in the General Appropriations Act, that amount shall not be reduced or withdrawn for any reason.

(d) (1) As used in this subsection, the term "budget report" means the budget report prepared pursuant to Code Section 45-12-74.

(2) For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2009, no funds shall be appropriated under subsection (c) of this Code section in any supplemental appropriation bill or General Appropriations Act unless the amount of estimated total revenues available for appropriation enumerated in the budget report for the current fiscal year exceeds the amount of estimated total revenues available for appropriation enumerated in the budget report for the most recent fiscal year in which homeowner tax relief grant funds were appropriated by 3 percent plus the percent change in the rate of economic inflation on individual taxpayers as determined under the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.

(e) When funds are appropriated as provided in this Code section, each fiscal authority shall follow the procedures specified in Code Section 36-89-4. When funds are not appropriated, each fiscal authority shall not follow the procedures specified in Code Section 36-89-4 and shall not include a notice on each tax bill regarding the unavailability of the credit.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-89-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 273, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1031, § 6; Ga. L. 2003, p. 665, § 46; Ga. L. 2009, p. 1, § 1/HB 143; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 36/HB 1387.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2002, p. 1031, § 9, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the Act shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002.

Ga. L. 2003, p. 665, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'State and Local Tax Revision Act of 2003.'"

Law reviews. - For note on the 2003 amendment to this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 233 (2003).

36-89-4. Procedure for allotment; conditions of grant; taxpayer notice.

Statute text

(a)(1) When funds are appropriated as provided in Code Section 36-89-3, such grants shall be allotted to each county, municipality, and county or independent school district in the state as follows:

(A) Immediately following the actual preparation of ad valorem property tax bills, each county fiscal authority shall notify the Department of Revenue of the total amount of tax revenue which would be generated by applying the sum of the state and county millage rates to the eligible assessed value of each qualified homestead in the county. The total amount of actual tax credits, so calculated, given to all qualified homesteads in the county shall be the amount of the grant to that county;

(B) Immediately following the actual preparation of ad valorem property tax bills, each county or independent school district's fiscal authority shall notify the Department of Revenue of the total amount of tax revenue which would be generated by applying the school millage rate to the eligible assessed value of each qualified homestead in the county or independent school district. The total amount of actual tax credits, so calculated, given to all qualified homesteads in the county or independent school district shall be the amount of the grant to that county or independent school district; and

(C) Immediately following the actual preparation of ad valorem property tax bills, each municipality's fiscal authority shall notify the Department of Revenue of the total amount of tax revenue which would be generated by applying the municipal millage rate to the eligible assessed value of each qualified homestead in the municipality. The total amount of actual tax credits, so calculated, given to all qualified homesteads in the municipality shall be the amount of the grant to that municipality.

(2) Credit amounts computed under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be applied to reduce the otherwise applicable tax liability on a dollar-for-dollar basis, but the credit granted shall not in any case exceed the amount of the otherwise applicable tax liability after the granting of all applicable homestead exemptions except for any homestead exemption under Article 2A of Chapter 8 of Title 48, the "Homestead Option Sales and Use Tax Act," as amended, and after the granting of all applicable millage rollbacks.

(b) The grant of funds to each county shall be conditioned on the county's fiscal authority reducing each qualified homestead's otherwise applicable liability for county taxes for county purposes by a credit amount calculated in subparagraph (a)(1)(A) of this Code section.

(c) The grant of funds to each county or independent school district shall be conditioned on the county or independent school district's fiscal authority reducing each qualified homestead's otherwise applicable liability for school taxes by a credit amount calculated in subparagraph (a)(1)(B) of this Code section.

(d) The grant of funds to each municipality shall be conditioned on the municipality's fiscal authority reducing each qualified homestead's otherwise applicable liability for municipal taxes by a credit amount calculated in subparagraph (a)(1)(C) of this Code section.

(e) Each fiscal authority shall show the credit amount on the tax bill, together with a prominent notice in substantially the following form: "This reduction in your bill is the result of homeowner's tax relief enacted by the Governor and the General Assembly of the State of Georgia."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-89-4, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 273, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 424, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1031, § 7.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2002, p. 1031, § 9, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the Act shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002.

36-89-5. Administration; rules and regulations; excess funds.

Statute text

(a) The state revenue commissioner shall administer this chapter and shall adopt rules and regulations for the administration of this chapter, including specific instructions to local governments. The state revenue commissioner may adopt procedures for partial or installment distribution of grants when the commissioner determines that a full distribution will only result in the necessity of return of funds under subsection (b) of this Code section.

(b) If any excess funds remain from the funds granted to any county, municipality, or county or independent school district under this chapter, after the county, municipality, or county or independent school district complies with the credit requirements of Code Section 36-89-4, such excess funds shall be returned by the county, municipality, or county or independent school district to the Department of Revenue.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-89-5, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 273, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1031, § 8; Ga. L. 2008, p. 324, § 36/SB 455.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2002, p. 1031, § 9, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the Act shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002.

36-89-6. Recovery of erroneous or illegal credit.

Statute text

Any credit under this chapter which is erroneously or illegally granted shall be recoverable by the political subdivision granting such credit in the same manner as any other delinquent tax.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-89-6, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 273, § 1.)

——————————

CHAPTER 90

LOCAL GOVERNMENT CABLE FAIR COMPETITION

Sec.

36-90-1. Short title.

36-90-2. Definitions.

36-90-3. Notifications to private providers before authorizing public provider; feasibility analysis and specific findings required; components of business plan; public hearings; requirements of ordinance or resolution.

36-90-4. Accounting methods regarding the cost of providing service; cross-subsidization prohibited.

36-90-5. Franchise agreements.

36-90-6. Price or rate charges by public providers.

36-90-7. Open meetings and records.

36-90-8. Immunity of local governments from antitrust liability.

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, this chapter, originally designated as Chapter 89 of Title 36, was redesignated as Chapter 90 of Title 36.

Law reviews. - For note on 1999 enactment of this chapter, see 16 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 183 (1999).

36-90-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Local Government Cable Fair Competition Act of 1999."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-90-1, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1267, § 1.)

36-90-2. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Authorization" means the official act of a franchising authority to allow a public provider to deliver service.

(2) "Cable service" means:

(A) The one-way transmission to subscribers of (i) video programming or (ii) other programming service; and

(B) Subscriber interaction, if any, which is required for the selection or use of such video programming or other programming service.

(3) "Capital costs" means all costs of providing a service which are capitalized in accordance with generally accepted governmental accounting principles.

(4) "Cross-subsidization" or "cross-subsidize" means the payment of any item of direct or indirect costs of providing a service which is not accounted for in the full cost accounting of providing the service.

(5) "Direct costs" means those expenses of a public provider which are directly attributable to the provision of a service that would be eliminated if the provision of said service were discontinued.

(6) "FCC" means the Federal Communications Commission.

(7) "Franchising authority" means any governmental entity which is empowered by law to grant a franchise and which is also a public provider.

(8) "Full-cost accounting" means the accounting for all costs incurred by a public provider in providing a service, including all direct and indirect costs, as required by this chapter. In preparation of such accounting, a public provider shall utilize cost accounting standards promulgated by the federal Costs Accounting Standards Board of the federal Office of Management and Budget so as to assure that all direct and indirect costs are included.

(9) "Generally accepted governmental accounting principles" means the accounting standards promulgated from time to time by the Governmental Accounting Standards Board.

(10) "Indirect costs" means any costs identified with two or more services or other public provider functions and which are not directly identified with a single service. Indirect costs may include, but are not limited to, administration, accounting, personnel, purchasing, legal, and other staff or departmental support. Indirect costs shall be allocated to two or more services in proportion to the relative burden each respective service places upon the cost category.

(11) "Private provider" means any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or association offering service, other than a public provider.

(12) "Public provider" means any county, municipal corporation, or other political subdivision of the state which provides service; any authority or instrumentality acting on behalf of or for the benefit of any county, municipal corporation, or other political subdivision of the state which provides service; and any authority or instrumentality created by the state which provides service.

(13) "Service" means cable service provided by a private provider or a public provider.

(14) "Subscriber" means any private person lawfully receiving any cable service provided by a private or public provider by means of or in connection with a cable system.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-90-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1267, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 990, § 2.)

36-90-3. Notifications to private providers before authorizing public provider; feasibility analysis and specific findings required; components of business plan; public hearings; requirements of ordinance or resolution.

Statute text

(a) Before a franchising authority may begin the authorization process of permitting a public provider to deliver service, the franchising authority must notify each private provider serving the targeted market that the franchising authority intends to begin the process of authorizing a public provider to provide cable service. The notice must state that the private provider is not meeting the present and future needs of the community and shall set forth each such unmet need separately and fully in order that the private provider may reasonably ascertain the scope and nature of the issues identified by the franchising authority. The franchising authority must allow each private provider 30 days to present a plan to address the identified needs not being met, including a reasonable period of time to implement the plan. Neither the notification nor response to the notification provided for in this subsection shall affect the franchise agreement between a private provider and a franchising authority.

(b) If the franchising authority does not accept the private provider's plan to address the identified issues submitted as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, the franchising authority shall then conduct an independent feasibility analysis and require the public provider to prepare a business plan to provide service. Such business plan shall set forth assumptions and specific findings as to:

(1) The cable service market share to be obtained by the public provider over a four-year period;

(2) The programming service offerings;

(3) Reasonable projections, for a period of at least four years, of the revenue and the direct, indirect, and imputed operating costs of providing service;

(4) The equipment needed to provide the service;

(5) The source and adequacy of the total direct and indirect capital to construct and operate the proposed system;

(6) The repayment of the debt service, including the length of payback of the principal debt;

(7) A cost-benefit analysis that shows a range of assumptions relating to market penetration rates, subscription rates, operating costs, and capital outlay;

(8) Assumptions as to programming costs;

(9) Assumptions as to actual or potential competition from all other providers;

(10) The allocation of costs between the public provider and other municipal operations; and

(11) The ability to address the issues cited in the notice to the private providers specified in subsection (a) of this Code section.

(c) In order for the business plan provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section to be adopted and the process to move forward, the business plan shall include, at a minimum, the following components:

(1) The total homes passed, provided that such shall be certified by the appropriate official responsible for municipal tax or census;

(2) Cable service basic penetration, estimated subscribers, and total homes passed, provided that such shall be reflective of the market analysis and not presume a penetration achieved by the fourth year of operation in excess of 40 percent without full independent verification;

(3) The overall estimated revenue takeout per home, provided that the same shall not exceed by more than 5 percent the amount being achieved by the private provider as developed from such publicly available information as franchise fee reports;

(4) The estimated miles of cable plant, provided that such shall be determined based on an actual survey conducted by public works employees and certified as to method and findings by a responsible supervisor;

(5) The average construction cost per cable service subscriber or cable plant mile or both, provided that such shall be based on an estimate provided by an independent supplier; and

(6) A definitive plan for the servicing of any capital utilized to fund the construction and operation of the cable system, including a reasonable payback period at an interest rate reflective of the public market and the inherent risks of the business.

(d) Prior to granting the authorization to the public provider, the franchising authority shall conduct at least two public hearings held at least two weeks apart. The public provider shall publish its business plan in its entirety and provide a complete copy to each private provider at least 30 days before the first public hearing. Such notice shall state that the business plan prepared by the public provider is available for public inspection each business day prior to the authorization and shall state the location where such inspection may be made. Notice of the time, place, and date of each hearing shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction of the county or municipality once a week for the two weeks preceding the week in which the hearing is to be held. In addition, the private provider shall be given two weeks' written notice of the proposed hearing.

(e) Any authorization by the franchising authority shall be by passage of an ordinance or resolution and must:

(1) Find that the public provider possesses satisfactory financial and technical capability to be a public provider;

(2) Set forth the terms and conditions with respect to franchise terms and conditions, conditions of access to public property, and pole attachment; and

(3) Adopt the business plan.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-90-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1267, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 990, § 3.)

36-90-4. Accounting methods regarding the cost of providing service; cross-subsidization prohibited.

Statute text

On and after January 1, 2000, each public provider shall prepare and maintain records in accordance with generally accepted governmental accounting principles which record the full cost accounting of providing service. Such records shall show the amount and source of capital, including working capital, utilized in providing service. Nothing contained in this chapter shall preclude a public provider utilizing capital from any lawful source, including the public provider's general funds, provided that the reasonable cost of such capital is accounted for as a cost of providing the service. No public provider shall cross-subsidize the costs of providing service. A public provider shall impute into its indirect costs of providing service an amount for franchise fees, regulatory fees, occupation taxes, pole attachment fees, and ad valorem property taxes, calculated in the same manner as such amounts are calculated for any private provider paying such costs to the public provider in the same service area.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-90-4, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1267, § 1.)

36-90-5. Franchise agreements.

Statute text

(a) In providing service, a public provider shall not employ terms more favorable or less burdensome than those imposed by the public provider upon any private provider providing the same service within its jurisdiction with respect to franchise terms and conditions, conditions of access to public property, and pole attachment.

(b) A franchising authority shall not impose or enforce any local regulation on any private provider which is not also made applicable to any competing public provider, nor shall a franchising authority discriminate between a public provider and private provider.

(c) A public provider may not unreasonably withhold a request by a private provider to transfer, modify, or renew its existing franchise in accordance with the terms of the franchise and in accordance with the provisions of 47 U.S.C. Section 537, 47 U.S.C. Section 545, and 47 U.S.C. Section 546.

(d) In any action by a franchising authority to enforce any term or condition of a franchise agreement, a violation of this Code section by the public provider with respect to such respective term or condition shall be a defense in such action.

(e) Nothing contained in this Code section shall be interpreted to limit the authority of the public provider, as the franchising authority, to collect franchise fees, control and regulate its streets and public ways, or enforce its powers to provide for the public health, safety, and welfare.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-90-5, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1267, § 1.)

36-90-6. Price or rate charges by public providers.

Statute text

On and after January 1, 2000, a public provider shall offer service at a price or rate to each subscriber which is either (1) equal to or greater than the price or rate for comparable service of competing private providers or (2) equal to or greater than the incremental direct and indirect costs of providing service to such subscriber. If, however, such service is required by state or federal law or regulation to be offered as a subsidized service, the funds to cover any deficiency in such costs shall be identified in the full cost accounting of such service.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-90-6, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1267, § 1.)

36-90-7. Open meetings and records.

Statute text

All meetings and records of public providers of a service shall be subject to the Georgia public records and public meetings laws contained, respectively, in Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50 and Chapter 14 of Title 50.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-90-7, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1267, § 1.)

36-90-8. Immunity of local governments from antitrust liability.

Statute text

The immunity from antitrust liability afforded to local governments by the provisions of Code Sections 36-65-1 and 36-65-2 shall not apply to public providers in the offering and providing of services as defined in this chapter; and public providers shall be subject to applicable antitrust liabilities, subject, however, to the provisions of the federal Local Government Antitrust Act of 1984, 15 U.S.C. Sections 34-36.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-90-8, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 1267, § 1.)

——————————

CHAPTER 91

PUBLIC WORKS BIDDING

Article 1

General Provisions.

36-91-1. Short title.

36-91-2. Definitions.

Article 2

Contracting and Bidding Requirements.

36-91-20. Written contract required; advertising; competitive sealed bidding; timing of addendums; prequalification.

36-91-21. Competitive award requirements.

36-91-22. Exceptions; use of inmate labor; emergency situations.

36-91-23. Prohibition of disqualification of otherwise qualified bidder from bid or proposal or prequalification based upon lack of previous experience; conditions.

36-91-24. Liquidated damages and other incentive provisions for project completion.

Article 3

Bonds.

Part 1

GENERAL PROVISIONS.

36-91-40. Approval and filing of bonds with treasurer.

36-91-41. No bid bond required under certain circumstances.

36-91-42 through 36-91-45. Redesignated.

Part 2

BID BONDS.

36-91-50. Projects requiring bid bonds; revocation of bids; surety.

36-91-51. Cash in lieu of bid bonds; letters of credit.

36-91-52. Bid and bidder defined; withdrawal of bids for appreciable errors; resubmission.

36-91-53. Affiliated corporation defined; forfeit of security by affiliated corporation.

36-91-54. Action on breach of bond.

Part 3

PERFORMANCE BONDS.

36-91-70. Requirement of performance bonds.

36-91-71. Acceptable substitutes for bond.

36-91-72. Action on performance bond.

36-91-73 through 36-91-75. Redesignated.

Part 4

PAYMENT BONDS.

36-91-90. Requirement for payment bonds.

36-91-91. Liability of contracting party to subcontractors for noncompliance.

36-91-92. Notice of commencement.

36-91-93. Rights of persons protected by payment bond or security deposit; governmental entity not a party.

36-91-94. Providing copy of bond or security deposit agreement.

36-91-95. Time limitation.

Article 4

Bidding for Government Works Projects.

36-91-100. Definitions.

36-91-101. Authority to enter into contracts; costs; grants or loans; eminent domain.

36-91-102. Planning, finance, construction, acquisition, leasing, operation, and maintenance of projects; implementation; lobbying restrictions.

Article 5

Partnership for Public Facilities and Infrastructure.

36-91-110. Definitions.

36-91-111. Creation of Partnership for Public Facilities and Infrastructure Act Guidelines Committee; membership; terms; allowances; duties; support.

36-91-112. Model guidelines.

36-91-113. Unsolicited proposals.

36-91-114. Approval process.

36-91-115. Comprehensive agreement.

36-91-116. Default and remedies.

36-91-117. Powers.

36-91-118. Sovereign or official immunity.

36-91-119. Article inapplicable to local government procurement via competitive sealed bidding; article inapplicable to certain transportation projects; public meeting requirements.

Annotations

Cross references. - State, county, and municipal road systems, § 32-4-1 et seq.

——————————

ARTICLE 1

GENERAL PROVISIONS

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Conspiracy or combination to prevent actual competition in bids for public work as affecting contract for the work or recovery therefor, 62 A.L.R. 224.

Validity of contract for material patented or held in monopoly where letting to lowest bidder is required, 77 A.L.R. 702.

Power of municipality to fix specific scale of wages or hours for employees of contractors or subcontractors for municipal contracts, 81 A.L.R. 349; 129 A.L.R. 763.

Differences in character or quality of materials, articles, or work as affecting acceptance of bid for public contract, 27 A.L.R.2d 917.

Contract for personal services as within requirement of submission of bids as condition of public contract, 15 A.L.R.3d 733.

Right of municipal corporation to recover back from contractor payments made under contract violating competitive bidding statute, 33 A.L.R.3d 397.

Validity, construction, and effect of requirement under state statute or local ordinance giving local or locally qualified contractors a percentage preference in determining lowest bid, 89 A.L.R.4th 587.

36-91-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Local Government Public Works Construction Law."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-1, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Contracts for public works, T. 13, C. 10.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 12, effective July 1, 2001, redesignated former Code Section 36-91-1 as present Code Section 36-91-2.

Law reviews. - For article, "General Overview of Procurement Process," see 10 Ga. St. B. J. 12 (2005). For article, "Construction Law," see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 51 (2018).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS
